Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.070

Persian Gulf veterans—Limited application of RCW 28B.92.060.

Under rules adopted by the council, the provisions of *RCW 28B.92.060(3) shall not apply to eligible students, as defined in RCW 28B.10.017, and eligible students shall not be required to repay the unused portions of grants received under the state student financial aid program.

[ 2012 c 229 s 559; 2004 c 275 s 38; 1991 c 164 s 3. Formerly RCW 28B.10.8081.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.92.060 was repealed by 2019 c 406 s 79 without cognizance of its amendment by 2019 c 298 s 4. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.